Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 14
Education

§ 1. Free school system.

Intelligence and virtue being the safeguards of liberty and the bulwark of a free and good government, the State shall ever maintain a general, suitable and efficient system of free public schools and shall adopt all suitable means to secure to the people the advantages and opportunities of education. The specific intention of this amendment is to authorize that in addition to existing constitutional or statutory provisions the General Assembly and/or public school districts may spend public funds for the education of persons over twenty-one (21) years of age and under six (6) years of age, as may be provided by law, and no other interpretation shall be given to it. [As amended by Const. Amend. 53.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment this section read: “Intelligence and virtue being the safeguards of liberty, and the bulwark of a free and good government, the State shall ever maintain a general, suitable and efficient system of free schools, whereby all persons in the State, between the ages of six and twenty-one years, may receive gratuitous instruction.”

§ 2. School fund — Use — Purposes.

No money or property belonging to the public school fund, or to this State, for the benefit of schools or universities, shall ever be used for any other than for the respective purposes to which it belongs.

§ 3. School tax — Budget — Approval of tax rate.

The General Assembly shall provide for the support of common schools by general law. In order to provide quality education, it is the goal of this state to provide a fair system for the distribution of funds. It is recognized that, in providing such a system, some funding variations may be necessary. The primary reason for allowing such variations is to allow school districts, to the extent permissible, to raise additional funds to enhance the educational system within the school district. It is further recognized that funding variations or restrictions thereon may be necessary in order to comply with, or due to, other provisions of this Constitution, the United States Constitution, state or federal laws, or court orders.

There is established a uniform rate of ad valorem property tax of twenty-five (25) mills to be levied on the assessed value of all taxable real, personal, and utility property in the state to be used solely for maintenance and operation of the schools.

Except as provided in this subsection the uniform rate of tax shall not be an additional levy for maintenance and operation of the schools but shall replace a portion of the existing rate of tax levied by each school district available for maintenance and operation of schools in the school district. The rate of tax available for maintenance and operation levied by each school district on the effective date of this amendment shall be reduced to reflect the levy of the uniform rate of tax. If the rate of tax available for maintenance and operation levied by a school district on the effective date of this amendment exceeds the uniform rate of tax, the excess rate of tax shall continue to be levied by the school district until changed as provided in subsection (c)(1). If the rate of tax available for maintenance and operation levied by a school district on the effective date of this amendment is less than the uniform rate of tax, the uniform rate of tax shall nevertheless be levied in the district.

The uniform rate of tax shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other school property taxes, but the net revenues from the uniform rate of tax shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and distributed by the state to the school districts as provided by law. No portion of the revenues from the uniform rate of tax shall be retained by the state. The revenues so distributed shall be used by the school districts solely for maintenance and operation of schools.

The General Assembly may by law propose an increase or decrease in the uniform rate of tax and submit the question to the electors of the state at the next general election. If a majority of the electors of the state voting on the issue vote For the proposed increase or decrease in the uniform rate of tax, the uniform rate of tax shall be increased or decreased as approved. If a majority of the electors of the state voting on the issue vote Against the proposed increase or decrease in the uniform rate of tax, the uniform rate of tax shall continue to be levied at the rate for the year in which the election is held.

In addition to the uniform rate of tax provided in subsection (b), school districts are authorized to levy, by a vote of the qualified electors respectively thereof, an annual ad valorem property tax on the assessed value of taxable real, personal, and utility property for the maintenance and operation of schools and the retirement of indebtedness. The Board of Directors of each school district shall prepare, approve and make public not less than sixty (60) days in advance of the annual school election a proposed budget of expenditures deemed necessary to provide for the foregoing purposes, together with a rate of tax levy sufficient to provide the funds therefor, including the rate under any continuing levy for the retirement of indebtedness. The Board of Directors shall submit the tax at the annual school election or at such other time as may be provided by law. If a majority of the qualified voters in the school district voting in the school election approve the rate of tax proposed by the Board of Directors, then the tax at the rate approved shall be collected as provided by law. In the event a majority of the qualified electors voting in the school election disapprove the proposed rate of tax, then the tax shall be collected at the rate approved in the last preceding school election. However, if the rate last approved has been modified pursuant to subsection (b) or (c)(2) of this section, then the tax shall be collected at the modified rate until another rate is approved.

The tax levied by a school district pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section may be reduced pursuant to procedures provided by law if the tax would cause the state or district to be out of compliance with any other provision of this Constitution, the United States Constitution, state or federal law, or court order.

No tax levied pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section shall be appropriated to any other district than that for which it is levied.

For the purposes of this section, “maintenance and operation” means such expenses for the general maintenance and operation of schools as may be defined by law. [As amended by Const. Amend. 11; Const. Amend. 40; Const. Amend. 74.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment, this section read: “The General Assembly shall provide, by general laws, for the support of Common Schools by taxes, which shall never exceed in any one year two mills on the dollar on the taxable property of the State; and by an annual per capita tax of one dollar, to be assessed on every male inhabitant of this State over the age of twenty-one years; Provided, The General Assembly may, by general law, authorize school districts to levy, by a vote of the qualified electors of such district, a tax not to exceed five mills on the dollar in any one year for school purposes; Provided further, That no such tax shall be appropriated to any other purpose, nor to any other district than that for which it was levied.”

An amendment adopted in 1906 (see Acts 1905, p. 833) raised the two-mill state tax to three mills and raised the authorized five-mill district tax to seven mills.

An amendment adopted in 1916 (see Acts 1917, p. 2304) raised the authorized seven-mill district tax to twelve mills.

As amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 11, this section read:

“The General Assembly shall provide by the general laws for support of common schools by taxes, which shall never exceed in any one year three mills on the dollar on the taxable property in the state, and by an annual per capita tax of one dollar, to be assessed on every male inhabitant of this State over the age of twenty-one-years. Provided that the General Assembly may, by general law, authorize school districts to levy by a vote of the qualified electors of such districts a tax not to exceed eighteen mills on the dollar in any one year for the maintenance of schools, the erection and equipment of school buildings and the retirement of existing indebtedness for buildings.

“Provided further that no such tax shall be appropriated for any other purpose nor to any other district than that for which it was levied.”

As amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 40, this section read:

“The General Assembly shall provide for the support of common schools by general law, including an annual per capita tax of one dollar, to be assessed on every male inhabitant of this State over the age of twenty-one years; and school districts are hereby authorized to levy by a vote of the qualified electors respectively thereof an annual tax for the maintenance of schools, the erection and equipment of school buildings and the retirement of existing indebtedness, the amount of such tax to be determined in the following manner:

“The Board of Directors of each school district shall prepare, approve and make public not less than sixty (60) days in advance of the annual school election a proposed budget of expenditures deemed necessary to provide for the foregoing purposes, together with a rate of tax levy sufficient to provide the funds therefor, including the rate under any continuing levy for the retirement of indebtedness. If a majority of the qualified voters in said school district voting in the annual school election shall approve the rate of tax so proposed by the Board of Directors, then the tax at the rate so approved shall be collected as provided by law. In the event a majority of said qualified electors voting in said annual school election shall disapprove the proposed rate of tax, then the tax shall be collected at the rate approved in the last preceding annual school election.

“Provided, that no such tax shall be appropriated for any other purpose nor to any other district than that for which it is levied.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 74, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 10 of 1995 and was adopted at the general election on November 5, 1996, and approved by a vote of 407,719 for and 378,017 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 74, § 2, provided:

“Nothing in this amendment shall be construed to diminish the authority of school districts over the supervision of public schools.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 74, § 3, provided:

“Any provision of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas in conflict with this Amendment is repealed in so far as it is in conflict with this Amendment.”

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 74, § 4: effective on adoption and shall apply to taxes due in 1997 and thereafter.

Cross References.

Implementation of Ark. Const. Amend. 74, § 26-80-101 et seq.

§ 4. Supervision of schools.

The supervision of public schools, and the execution of the laws regulating the same, shall be vested in and confided to, such officers as may be provided for by the General Assembly.